Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1810
Metropolitan transit authority; property; exempt from taxation; exceptions.

An authority created pursuant to the Transit Authority Law being a governmental subdivision of the State of Nebraska to exercise public and essential governmental functions, all property thereof, all operations thereof, and all rights to operate, of whatsoever character, and all bonds and equipment trust notes or certificates issued by it, shall be exempt from any and all forms of assessment and taxation, and from all other governmental and municipal licenses, excises, and charges, except for assessments under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act and any combined tax due or payments in lieu of contributions as required under the Employment Security Law.

Laws 1957, c. 23, § 10, p. 167;

Laws 1972, LB 1275, § 10;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 11;

Laws 2022, LB780, § 1.
July 21, 2022
Employment Security Law, see section 48-601.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.